North Carolina, session 2025, SB567.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1. The Department of Health and Human Services, Division of Health
Benefits, shall make all of the following adjustments to the Medicaid Program:
(1) Increase rates paid for ASAM level 2.1 substance use intensive outpatient
program services to two hundred fifty-five dollars and twenty-eight cents
($255.28) per diem.
(2) Increase the rates paid for ASAM level 2.5 substance use comprehensive
outpatient treatment program services to four hundred dollars ($400.00) per
diem.
(3) Establish coverage for ASAM level 3.1 clinically managed low-intensity
Residential Treatment services. A rate of three hundred fifty dollars ($350.00)
per diem shall be paid for these services.
(4) Establish coverage for ASAM level 3.3 clinically managed high-intensity
treatment services. A rate of two hundred fifty dollars ($250.00) per diem shall
be paid for these services.
(5) Establish coverage for ASAM level 3.5 clinically managed residential
treatment services. A rate of five hundred fifty dollars ($550.00) per diem
shall be paid for these services.
(6) Increase the rates paid for ASAM level 3.7 substance use medically monitored
community residential treatment services to six hundred fifty dollars
($650.00) per diem.
(7) Increase the rates paid for ASAM level 3.7 non-hospital medical
detoxification services to seven hundred fifty-six dollars and sixty-five cents
($756.65) per diem.
SECTION 2. There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits, the sum of fifteen million dollars
($15,000,000) in recurring funds for each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium to be used to
effectuate the rate changes under this act. These funds shall provide a State match for
twenty-seven million four hundred thousand dollars ($27,400,000) in recurring federal funds for
each year of the 2025-2027 fiscal biennium, and those funds are appropriated to the Division of
Health Benefits for the same purpose.
SECTION 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.
*S567-v-1*